District of Columbia statutes.
35-103

Disposition of proceeds of sale.

The residue of moneys arising from any such sale, under either § 35-101 or § 35-102, after deducting the amount of charges, including charges for transportation, the cost of handling and storage, demurrage, and the costs and expenses of proceedings to authorize the sale, and of advertising and sale, shall be paid to the owner of such freight, baggage, or other property on demand.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1289, ch. 854, § 644
1981 Ed., § 44-103.
1973 Ed., § 44-103.